Maryland, session 2026, SB0164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–435.
(a) There is a Pamela J. Kelly Tree–Mendous Maryland Program in the
Department.
(b) The Program is established for the purpose of ADVANCING FOREST HEALTH
AND RESILIENCE BY PROMOTING, planting, AND MAINTAINING PROMOTING
COMMUNITY PARTICIPATION IN THE TREE PLANTING AND STEWARDSHIP AND THE
PLANTING AND MAINTAINING OF native trees and shrubs THROUGH COMMUNITY
FORESTRY ACTIVITIES on public lands, community open spaces, school grounds, and
rights–of–way.
(c) The Department shall administer the Program.
(d) The Department may adopt regulations to carry out this part.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.